src/fst/stems/adpositions.lexc
LEXICON Deictics 
soo+PP+Deic:soo PP_FINAL ;
sii+PP+Deic:sii PP_FINAL ;

! 
LEXICON Gen_Postp
aawadeed+PostP:aawadeed Clitics "For the sake of, because of X" ;


LEXICON FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG
:´ PP_FINAL ;
+Neg/ma:ma´´ PP_FINAL ;

! 
LEXICON PP_FINAL
FINAL ;
! CmpNGVerb ;


! vim: set ts=4 sw=4 tw=0 syntax=lexc :

LEXICON Obj_Adp_Adp
i+Pron+Pers+1Sg+Sem/Obj+Adp/u+Adp/u:iigu FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;
i+Pron+Pers+1Sg+Sem/Obj+Adp/u+Adp/ka:iiga FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;
i+Pron+Pers+1Sg+Sem/Obj+Adp/u+Adp/la:iila FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;
i+Pron+Pers+1Sg+Sem/Obj+Adp/ka+Adp/ka:igaga FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;
i+Pron+Pers+1Sg+Sem/Obj+Adp/ku+Adp/la:igula FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;
i+Pron+Pers+1Sg+Sem/Obj+Adp/ka+Adp/la:igala FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;
ku+Pron+Pers+2Sg+Sem/Obj+Adp/u+Adp/u:kuugu FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;
ku+Pron+Pers+2Sg+Sem/Obj+Adp/u+Adp/ka:kaaga FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;
ku+Pron+Pers+2Sg+Sem/Obj+Adp/u+Adp/la:kuula FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;
ku+Pron+Pers+2Sg+Sem/Obj+Adp/ka+Adp/ka:kaaga FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;
ku+Pron+Pers+2Sg+Sem/Obj+Adp/ku+Adp/la:kugula FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;
ku+Pron+Pers+2Sg+Sem/Obj+Adp/ka+Adp/la:kaala FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;
na+Pron+Pers+1Pl+Excl+Sem/Obj+Adp/u+Adp/u:noogu FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;
na+Pron+Pers+1Pl+Excl+Sem/Obj+Adp/u+Adp/ka:nooga FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;
na+Pron+Pers+1Pl+Excl+Sem/Obj+Adp/u+Adp/la:noola FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;
na+Pron+Pers+1Pl+Excl+Sem/Obj+Adp/ka+Adp/ka:nagaga FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;
na+Pron+Pers+1Pl+Excl+Sem/Obj+Adp/ku+Adp/la:nagula FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;
na+Pron+Pers+1Pl+Excl+Sem/Obj+Adp/ka+Adp/la:nagala FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;
ina+Pron+Pers+1Pl+Incl+Sem/Obj+Adp/u+Adp/u:inoogu FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;
ina+Pron+Pers+1Pl+Incl+Sem/Obj+Adp/u+Adp/ka:inooga FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;
ina+Pron+Pers+1Pl+Incl+Sem/Obj+Adp/u+Adp/la:inoola FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;
ina+Pron+Pers+1Pl+Incl+Sem/Obj+Adp/ka+Adp/ka:inagaga FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;
ina+Pron+Pers+1Pl+Incl+Sem/Obj+Adp/ku+Adp/la:inagula FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;
ina+Pron+Pers+1Pl+Incl+Sem/Obj+Adp/ka+Adp/la:inagala FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;
idinka+Pron+Pers+2Pl+Sem/Obj+Adp/u+Adp/u:idiinku FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ; 
idinka+Pron+Pers+2Pl+Sem/Obj+Adp/u+Adp/ka:idiinka FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ; 
idinka+Pron+Pers+2Pl+Sem/Obj+Adp/u+Adp/la:idiinla FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ; 
idinka+Pron+Pers+2Pl+Sem/Obj+Adp/ka+Adp/ka:idinkaga FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ; 
idinka+Pron+Pers+2Pl+Sem/Obj+Adp/ku+Adp/la:idinkula FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ; 
idinka+Pron+Pers+2Pl+Sem/Obj+Adp/ka+Adp/la:idinkala FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ; 
la+Pron+Pers+Impers+Subj+Adp/u+Adp/u:loogu FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ; 
la+Pron+Pers+Impers+Subj+Adp/u+Adp/ka:looga FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ; 
la+Pron+Pers+Impers+Subj+Adp/u+Adp/la:loola FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ; 
la+Pron+Pers+Impers+Subj+Adp/ka+Adp/ka:loogaga FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ; 
la+Pron+Pers+Impers+Subj+Adp/ku+Adp/la:loogula FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ; 
la+Pron+Pers+Impers+Subj+Adp/ka+Adp/la:loogala FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ; 
la+Pron+Pers+Impers+1SgObj/i+Adp/u:la%-ii FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;
la+Pron+Pers+Impers+1SgObj/i+Adp/ku:laygu FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;
la+Pron+Pers+Impers+1SgObj/i+Adp/ka:layga FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;
la+Pron+Pers+Impers+1SgObj/i+Adp/la:layla FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;
la+Pron+Pers+Impers+1SgObj/i+Adp/u+Adp/u:laiigu FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;
la+Pron+Pers+Impers+1SgObj/i+Adp/u+Adp/ka:laiiga FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;
la+Pron+Pers+Impers+1SgObj/i+Adp/u+Adp/la:laiila FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;
la+Pron+Pers+Impers+1SgObj/i+Adp/ka+Adp/ka:laygaga FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;
la+Pron+Pers+Impers+1SgObj/i+Adp/ku+Adp/la:laygula FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;
la+Pron+Pers+Impers+1SgObj/i+Adp/ga+Adp/la:laygala FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;
la+Pron+Pers+Impers+2SgObj/ku+Adp/u:laguu FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;
la+Pron+Pers+Impers+2SgObj/ku+Adp/ku:lagugu FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;
la+Pron+Pers+Impers+2SgObj/ku+Adp/ka:lagaa FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;
la+Pron+Pers+Impers+2SgObj/ku+Adp/la:lagula FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;
la+Pron+Pers+Impers+2SgObj/ku+Adp/u+Adp/u:laguugu FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;
la+Pron+Pers+Impers+2SgObj/ku+Adp/u+Adp/ka:lagaaga FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;
la+Pron+Pers+Impers+2SgObj/ku+Adp/u+Adp/la:laguula FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;
la+Pron+Pers+Impers+2SgObj/ku+Adp/ka+Adp/ka:lagaaga FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;
la+Pron+Pers+Impers+2SgObj/ku+Adp/ku+Adp/la:lagugula FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;
la+Pron+Pers+Impers+2SgObj/ku+Adp/ga+Adp/la:lagaala FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;
